Alaska, session 34, SB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.57 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Article 4. Museum Construction and Expansion Grants. 06 Sec. 14.57.300. Museum construction and major expansion matching 07 grant program. (a) A matching grant program for museum construction and major 08 expansion is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 09 Development. A grant may be awarded to a museum for construction of a new facility 10 or a major expansion project to 11 (1) increase the square footage of an existing facility by at least 30 12 percent; 13 (2) add storage space for artifacts in an existing museum facility; 14 (3) acquire new artifacts; 01 (4) expand the services or programs offered by the museum; 02 (5) improve or renovate the existing infrastructure of a museum facility 03 to extend the life of the facility; or 04 (6) build, purchase, or lease additional space to store artifacts or 05 construct exhibits that is not connected to the original museum facility. 06 (b) A person in charge of construction or major expansion of an eligible 07 museum may apply to the department for a matching grant under regulations adopted 08 by the department. 09 (c) Subject to appropriation, the department shall award not more than 50 10 percent of the total proposed grant project costs to an eligible applicant. 11 (d) To be eligible for a grant under this section, an applicant must provide 12 matching funds from 13 (1) the local government entity in an amount that is at least 20 percent 14 of the total proposed grant project costs; and 15 (2) private donors in an amount that is equal to or greater than the 16 remaining total of the proposed grant project costs after the state and local 17 contributions are made toward the project. 18 (e) The department shall establish regulations to implement this section. 19 (f) In this section, 20 (1) "department" means the Department of Commerce, Community, 21 and Economic Development; 22 (2) "museum" has the meaning given in AS 14.57.290. 23 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.